Maryland, session 2025, SB0072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1–230.
(A) IF A HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD REQUIRES EVIDENCE OF ENGLISH
PROFICIENCY AS A CONDITION FOR LICENSURE, CERTIFICATION, OR
REGISTRATION, THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD MAY NOT REQUIRE AN
APPLICANT WHO HOLDS A VALID, UNRESTRICTED LICENSE, CERTIFICATION, OR
– 1 –

Ch. 732 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
REGISTRATION FROM ANOTHER STATE THAT REQUIRES EVIDENCE OF ENGLISH
PROFICIENCY FOR LICENSURE, CERTIFICATION, OR REGISTRATION TO PROVIDE
ADDITIONAL EVIDENCE OF ENGLISH PROFICIENCY.
(B) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD THAT REQUIRES EVIDENCE OF
ENGLISH PROFICIENCY AS A CONDITION FOR LICENSURE, CERTIFICATION, OR
REGISTRATION SHALL PROMINENTLY MAINTAIN ON ITS WEBSITE A LIST OF OTHER
STATES THAT HAVE AN ENGLISH PROFICIENCY REQUIREMENT THAT MEETS THE
HEALTH OCCUPATION BOARD’S ENGLISH PROFICIENCY REQUIREMENT STATEMENT
THAT AN APPLICANT MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL EVIDENCE OF
ENGLISH PROFICIENCY IF THE APPLICANT HOLDS A VALID, UNRESTRICTED
LICENSE, CERTIFICATION, OR REGISTRATION FROM ANOTHER STATE THAT
REQUIRES EVIDENCE OF ENGLISH PROFICIENCY FOR LICENSURE, CERTIFICATION,
OR REGISTRATION.
8–302.
(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Board shall require
as part of its examination or licensing procedures that an applicant for a license to practice
registered nursing or licensed practical nursing demonstrate a written and oral competency
in the English language.
(2) Acceptable proof of proficiency in the communication of the English
language under this section includes:
(i) After at least 3 years of enrollment, graduation from a recognized
English–speaking undergraduate school;
(ii) Graduation from a recognized English–speaking professional
school; [or]
(iii) Completion of at least 5 years of practicing nursing in another
state or English–speaking territory of the United States;
(IV) PASSING AN ENGLISH PROFICIENCY EXAM APPROVED BY
THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES; OR
(V) HOLDING A VALID, UNENCUMBERED MULTISTATE LICENSE
UNDER THE NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT.
(3) If any disciplinary charge or action that involves a problem with
communicating in the English language is brought against a licensee under this title, the
Board shall require the licensee to take and pass a Board approved standardized test of
English language competency.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 732
(4) The Board may not require that an applicant for a license to practice
registered nursing or licensed practical nursing who IS OR was previously licensed in any
other state to practice registered nursing or licensed practical nursing to demonstrate
competency in the English language as part of its examination or licensing procedures if
the other state has [a similar] AN English language competency component as part of its
examination or licensing procedures.
(5) (i) The Board may issue a temporary license to any applicant for a
license to practice registered nursing or licensed practical nursing who was previously
licensed in any other state to practice registered nursing or licensed practical nursing and
who, except for the competency in the English language component, is otherwise qualified
for a license.
(ii) A temporary license issued under this subsection is valid only
until the date when the next test to demonstrate competency in the English language is
given.
8–307.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Board may issue a license by
endorsement and waive any appropriate examination requirement of this title for an
applicant who has an active unencumbered license to practice registered nursing or
licensed practical nursing in any other state or country.
(b) The Board may issue a license by endorsement under this section only if the
applicant:
(1) Submits to the Board an application on the form that the Board
requires;
(2) Submits to a criminal history records check in accordance with § 8–303
of this subtitle;
(3) Pays the application fee set by the Board under § 8–304 of this subtitle;
and
(4) (I) 1. HOLDS A VALID, UNENCUMBERED MULTISTATE
LICENSE UNDER THE NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT; OR
2. Provides adequate evidence that:
[(i)] A. At the time the applicant graduated from a nursing
education program approved in the other state or country, the applicant met the
educational qualifications then required by the laws of this State; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 732 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii)] B. At the time the applicant became licensed or registered in
the other state or country, the applicant passed in that or any other state or country an
examination that was similar to the examination that then was given in this State; and
[(iii)] (II) [The applicant meets] MEETS the qualifications
otherwise required by this title.
12–302.
(g) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Board shall
require, as part of its examination or licensing procedures, an applicant for a license to
practice pharmacy to demonstrate an oral competency in the English language by passing
a Board approved standardized test of oral competency.
(2) The Board shall adopt regulations that establish a procedure for testing
an individual who because of the individual’s speech or hearing impairment is unable to
complete satisfactorily a Board approved standardized test of oral competency.
(3) If any disciplinary charge or action that relates to a problem with the
oral communication of the English language is brought against a licensee under this title,
the Board shall require the licensee to pass a Board approved standardized test of oral
competency.
(4) The Board may not require an applicant for a license to practice
pharmacy, who IS OR was previously licensed in another state to practice pharmacy, to
demonstrate an oral competency in the English language, if the other state’s examination
and licensing procedures at the time the applicant was licensed in the other state included
an oral competency component [similar to the oral competency component in this State’s
examination and licensing procedures].
(5) Graduation from a recognized English–speaking professional school
accredited by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education is acceptable as proof of
proficiency in the oral communication of the English language under this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –